Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1863.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:(1) Beginning in the 2025-26 school year, each school district must ensure that each school within the district develops a cardiac emergency response plan to prepare for persons who may experience a cardiac arrest on school property inclusive of attendees and participants in athletic practices or events.(2) School officials shall work with local emergency service providers to integrate the cardiac emergency response plan into the community's emergency service response protocols.(3)(a) Each cardiac emergency response plan required by this section must include evidence-based core elements, such as those recommended by the American heart association or other national science organization.(b) Each cardiac emergency response plan must:(i) Designate a cardiac emergency response team comprised of school staff and inclusive of coaches, school nurses, athletic trainers, teachers, counselors, and administrators;(ii) Establish procedures for activating the cardiac emergency response team if a person experiences cardiac arrest on school property;(iii) Designate locations on school property for the installation of automated external defibrillators in accordance with guidance set by the American heart association or other national science organization, with the goal that they can be placed on a person experiencing cardiac arrest on school property or at athletic venues where practices or competitions are held within three minutes of school staff becoming aware of the cardiac arrest;(iv) Establish a regular maintenance schedule, in accordance with the manufacturer's operational guidelines, for automated external defibrillators installed on school property;(v) Establish a regular schedule, consistent with the American heart association or other national science organization guidelines, for cardiac emergency response team training in cardiopulmonary resuscitation, first aid, and automated external defibrillator use;(vi) Establish dates for annual drills in cardiopulmonary resuscitation, first aid, and automated external defibrillator use;(vii) Describe the coordination and integration of the cardiac emergency response plan with local emergency service providers; and(viii) Establish procedures for responding to incidents of cardiac arrest that occur off-campus during school-sponsored events.(4) Staff from each school shall review and update their cardiac emergency response plan at least annually.(5) School staff training in cardiopulmonary resuscitation, first aid, and automated external defibrillator use must follow evidence-based guidelines set by the American heart association or other national science organization.(6) Locations for automated external defibrillator installations must be determined by the cardiac emergency response plan and in accordance with guidance set by the American heart association or other national science organization. Each automated external defibrillator must be identified with clear signage and stored in an unlocked location on school property.(7) Each automated external defibrillator must be tested and maintained by the school according to the manufacturer's operational guidelines and local emergency service providers must be notified of its type and location.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall establish and administer a grant program to help public schools develop cardiac emergency response plans and implementation procedures, staff training, and automated external defibrillator purchases and maintenance in accordance with section 1 of this act. In awarding grants under this section to school districts for use in public schools, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall prioritize schools where 50 percent or more of the enrolled students, averaged over the previous three years before applying for a grant, are eligible for free or reduced-price meals.(2) School districts and public schools may accept gifts, grants, and donations, including in-kind donations intended for: (a) The purchase of an automated external defibrillator that meets the standards established by the United States food and drug administration; (b) costs incurred to inspect and maintain the defibrillator; and (c) costs incurred to train staff in the use of the defibrillator.(3) This section governs school operation and management under RCW 28A.710.040 and 28A.715.020 and applies to charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW and state-tribal education compact schools subject to chapter 28A.715 RCW to the same extent as it applies to school districts.Sec. 3. RCW 28A.300.471 and 2013 c 181 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) An automated external defibrillator is often a critical component in the chain of survival for a cardiac arrest victim.(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with school districts and stakeholder groups, shall develop guidance for a medical emergency response and automated external defibrillator program for high schools.(3) The medical emergency response and automated external defibrillator program must comply with current evidence-based guidance from the American heart association or other national science organization.(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the department of health, shall assist districts in carrying out a program under this section, including providing guidelines and advice for seeking grants, including grants administered under section 2 of this act, for the purchase of automated external defibrillators or seeking donations of automated external defibrillators. The superintendent may coordinate with local health districts or other organizations in seeking grants and donations for this purpose.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 28A.600 RCW to read as follows:Beginning in the 2026-27 school year, all athletic coaches for activities governed by the Washington interscholastic activities association or other comparable voluntary nonprofit entity shall obtain and maintain training in cardiopulmonary resuscitation, first aid, and the use of an automated external defibrillator. Certification in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and automated external defibrillator use must be consistent with national evidence-based emergency cardiovascular care guidelines.--- END ---